src/third_party/mozjs/extract/intl/locales/eo/hyphenation/hyph_eo.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
a1
e1
i1
o1
u1
2aj.
2a2jn.
a4j1n
2an.
2as.
2oj.
2o2jn.
o4j1n
2on.
2os.
2us.
a3a1
e3a1
i3a1
o3a1
u3a1
a3e1
e3e1
i3e1
o3e1
u3e1
a3i1
e3i1
i3i1
o3i1
u3i1
a3o1
e3o1
i3o1
o3o1
u3o1
a3u1
e3u1
i3u1
o3u1
u3u1
e2sper
es1p
espe1
4j1n
2jn.
4l1p
2lp.
4l1t
2lt.
4n1k
2nk.
4n1s
2ns.
4n1t
2nt.
s1t
2st.
.bl4
.br4
.dr4
.d1l4
.fl4
.fr4
.gl4
.g1n4
.gr4
.kl4
.k1n4
.kr4
.k1v4
.pl4
.pr4
.p1s4
.p1t4
.s1f4
.s1k4
.skl4
.skr4
.sk1v4
.s1l4
.s1m4
.s1n4
.s1p4
.spl4
.spr4
.s1t4
.str4
.s1v4
.ŝl4
.ŝ1m4
.ŝ1n4
.ŝ1p4
.ŝr4
.ŝpr4
.ŝ1t4
.ŝtr4
.ŝ1v4
.tr4
.vr4
1a2ĉa.
a1ĉa1
1a2ĉ2aj.
1a2ĉ2a2jn.
aĉa4j1n
1a2ĉ2an.
1a2ĉe.
aĉe1
1a2ĉo.
aĉo1
1a2ĉ2oj.
1a2ĉ2o2jn.
aĉo4j1n
1a2ĉ2on.
1a2da.
a1da1
1a2d2aj.
1a2d2a2jn.
ada4j1n
1a2d2an.
1a2de.
ade1
1a2do.
ado1
1a2d2oj.
1a2d2o2jn.
ado4j1n
1a2d2on.
1a2d2as.
1a2di.
adi1
1a2dis.
1a2d2os.
1a2du.
adu1
1a2d2us.
.avok2a3d
.a1
.avo1
.avoka1
.bal2a3d
.ba1
.bala1
ĉokol2a3d
ĉo1
ĉoko1
ĉokola1
.fas2a3d
.fa1
.fasa1
.inv2a3d
.i1
.i4n1v2
.inva1
kamar2a3d
ka1
kam2a3r
kama1
kamara1
.ka3n
.kan2a3d
.ka1
.kana1
limon2a3d
li1
limo1
limona1
persv2a3d
pe1
pe4r1s
pers1v
persva1
.pom2a3d
.po1
.poma1
seren2a3d
se1
sere1
serena1
1a2ĵa.
a1ĵa1
1a2ĵ2aj.
1a2ĵ2a2jn.
aĵa4j1n
1a2ĵ2an.
1a2ĵe.
aĵe1
1a2ĵo.
aĵo1
1a2ĵ2oj.
1a2ĵ2o2jn.
aĵo4j1n
1a2ĵ2on.
.a4l2t
al3tabl
a4l1t
a1lta1
al3t2a3r
al3ter
alte1
al3tru3i1
altru1
1a2na.
a1na1
1a2n2aj.
1a2n2a2jn.
ana4j1n
1a2n2an.
1a2ne.
ane1
1a2no.
ano1
1a2n2oj.
1a2n2o2jn.
ano4j1n
1a2n2on.
1a2n2as.
1a2ni.
ani1
1a2nis.
1a2n2os.
1a2nu.
anu1
1a2n2us.
1a2ni4s1m
1a2n1i2n
afg2a3n
a4f1g
afga1
akomp2a3n
ako1
ako4m1p
akompa1
arg2a3n
a4r1g
arga1
ark2a3n
a4r1k
arka1
ban2a3n
ba1
bana1
but2a3n
bu1
buta1
cig2a3n
ci1
ciga1
ĉambel2a3n
ĉa1
ĉa4m1b
ĉambe1
ĉambela1
ĉamp2a3n
ĉa4m1p
ĉampa1
ĉarlat2a3n
ĉa4r1l
ĉarla1
ĉarlata1
ĉik2a3n
ĉi1
ĉika1
dek2a3n
de1
deka1
dog2a3n
do1
doga1
el2a3n
ela1
faz2a3n
fa1
faza1
font2a3n
fo1
fo4n1t
fonta1
galv2a3n
ga1
ga4l1v
galva1
germ2a3n
ge1
ge4r1m
germa1
ĝentlem2a3n
ĝe1
ĝe4n1t
ĝentle1
ĝentlema1
hisp2a3n
hi1
his1p
hispa1
.ĥa3n
.ĥa1
inf2a3n
i4n1f
infa1
ir2a3n
ira1
jap2a3n
ja1
japa1
kalk2a3n
ka4l1k
kalka1
kank2a3n
ka4n1k
kanka1
kapit2a3n
kapi1
kapita1
kard2a3n
ka4r1d
karda1
karav2a3n
kara1
karava1
kor2a3n
ko1
kora1
.ma3n
.ma1
marcip2a3n
ma1
ma4r1c
marci1
marcipa1
membr2a3n
me1
me4m1b
membra1
met2a3n
meta1
nirv2a3n
ni1
ni4r1v
nirva1
.on2a3n
.o1
.ona1
org2a3n
o4r1g
orga1
.pa3n
.pa1
partiz2a3n
pa1
pa4r1t
parti1
partiza1
pelik2a3n
peli1
pelika1
porcel2a3n
po1
po4r1c
porce1
porcela1
prof2a3n
pro1
profa1
.ra3n
.ra1
rum2a3n
ru1
ruma1
.sa3n
.sa1
4s1l
3s2log2a3n
slo1
sloga1
sopr2a3n
so1
sopra1
stef2a3n
ste1
stefa1
sufrag2a3n
su1
sufra1
sufraga1
sult2a3n
su4l1t
sulta1
ŝam2a3n
ŝa1
ŝama1
teher2a3n
te1
tehe1
tehera1
tir2a3n
ti1
tira1
turb2a3n
tu1
tu4r1b
turba1
.va3n
.va1
vatik2a3n
va1
vati1
vatika1
veter2a3n
ve1
vete1
vetera1
vulk2a3n
vu1
vu4l1k
vulka1
.k1a3n2i3n
.kani1
safr2a3n2i3n
sa1
safra1
safrani1
.t1a3n2i3n
.ta1
.tani1
1an2ta.
a4n1t
a1nta1
1an2t2aj.
1an2t2a2jn.
anta4j1n
1an2t2an.
1an2te.
ante1
1an2to.
anto1
1an2t2oj.
1an2t2o2jn.
anto4j1n
1an2t2on.
adjut2a4n3t
a4d1j2
adju1
adjuta1
.arog2a4n3t
.aro1
.aroga1
.atl2a4n3t
.atla1
.ba4n3t
.brok2a4n3t
.bro1
.broka1
.diam2a4n3t
.di1
.di3a1
.diama1
dilet2a4n3t
di1
dile1
dileta1
disk2a4n3t
dis1k
diska1
elef2a4n3t
e1le1
elefa1
.gal2a4n3t
.ga1
.gala1
.g1i2g2a4n3t
.gi1
.giga1
inf2a4n3t
inst2a4n3t
i4n1s
in1s2t
insta1
konson2a4n3t
ko4n1s
konso1
konsona1
.ka4n3t
konst2a4n3t
kon1s2t
konsta1
k1v
kvadr2a4n3t
kva1
kvadra1
.kv2a4n3t
.kva1
leŭten2a4n3t
le1
le4ŭ1
leŭte1
leŭtena1
mom2a4n3t
mo1
moma1
.okt2a4n3t
.o4k1t
.okta1
.ped2a4n3t
.pe1
.peda1
.pla4n3t
.pla1
tal2a4n3t
ta1
ta1la1
batal3a4n4t
bata1
batala1
1an2t3ar
an3t2ar4k1t
anta4r1k
kan3t2arel
k1an2t3ar
ka4n1t
ka1nta1
kantare1
1an2t1ig
anti1
1an2t1ec
.apu2d1
.apu1
1a2ra.
a1ra1
1a2r2aj.
1a2r2a2jn.
ara4j1n
1a2r2an.
1a2re.
are1
1a2ro.
aro1
1a2r2oj.
1a2r2o2jn.
aro4j1n
1a2r2on.
1a2rig
ari1
1a2riĝ
am2a3r
ama1
barb2a3r
ba4r1b
barba1
baz2a3r
baza1
biz2a3r
bi1
biza1
boj2a3r
bo1
boja1
bulg2a3r
bu4l1g
bulga1
.c1i3d2a3r
.ci1
.cida1
cig2a3r
din2a3r
dina1
dol2a3r
dola1
er2a3r
era1
fanf2a3r
fa4n1f
fanfa1
.f2a3r
form2u3l
form1u2l2a3r
fo4r1m
formu1
formula1
garg2a3r
ga4r1g
garga1
git2a3r
gi1
gita1
.ha3r2
.ha1
hung2a3r
hu1
hu4n1g
hunga1
invent2a3r
i4n1v2
inve1
inve4n1t
inventa1
izob2a3r
izo1
izoba1
jug2u3l2a3r
ju1
jugu1
jugula1
kalend2a3r
kale1
kale4n1d
kalenda1
kap2i3l2a3r
kapila1
kla3r
kla1
komp2a3r
ko4m1p
kompa1
kulin2a3r
ku1
kuli1
kulina1
kvatern2a3r
kvate1
kvate4r1n
kvaterna1
lap2i3d2a3r
la1
lapi1
lapida1
.mol2a3r
.mo1
.mola1
najb4a1r
na1
na4j1b
najba1
om2a3r
oma1
ordin2a3r
o4r1d
ordi1
ordina1
partik2u3l
partik2u3l2a3r
partiku1
partikula1
.pol2a3r
.pola1
pop2u3l2a3r
popu1
popula1
prep2a3r
pre1
prepa1
prim2a3r
pri1
prima1
rad2a3r
ra1
rada1
remp2a3r
re1
re4m1p
rempa1
rip2a3r
ri1
ripa1
sa3m2ov2a3r
samo1
samova1
sanit2a3r
sani1
sanita1
sek2u3l2ar
seku1
sekula1
sekund2a3r
seku4n1d
sekunda1
sing2u3l2ar
si1
si4n1g
singu1
singula1
s1k
skal2a3r
ska1
skala1
.st2a3r
.sta1
sol2i3d2a3r
soli1
solida1
tal2a3r
tat2a3r
tata1
.vel2a3r
.ve1
.vela1
vulg2a3r
vu4l1g
vulga1
1a2ta.
a1ta1
1a2t2aj.
1a2t2a2jn.
ata4j1n
1a2t2an.
1a2te.
ate1
1a2to.
ato1
1a2t2oj.
1a2t2o2jn.
ato4j1n
1a2t2on.
1a2t1ec
adiab2a3t
a1di3a1
adiaba1
agreg2a3t
agre1
agrega1
aŭtom2a3t
a4ŭ1
aŭto1
aŭtoma1
aŭtorit2a3t
aŭtori1
aŭtorita1
.ab2a3t
.aba1
.adekv2a3t
.ade1
.adek1v
.adekva1
advok2a3t
a4d1v
advo1
advoka1
afrik2a3t
afri1
afrika1
.ag2a3t
.aga1
1a2kr
akrob2a3t
akro1
akroba1
.akur2a3t
.aku1
.akura1
alop2a3t
alo1
alopa1
.apar2a3t
.apa1
.apara1
apost2a3t
apo1
apos1t
aposta1
arom2a3t
aroma1
.ba3t
.bl2a3t
.bla1
.brok2a3t
.deb2a3t
.de1
.deba1
delik2a3t
deli1
delika1
diplom2a3t
diplo1
diploma1
.duk2a3t
.du1
.duka1
.et2a3t
.e1
.eta1
fakult2a3t
faku1
faku4l1t
fakulta1
.fr2a3t
.fra1
.gefr2a3t
.ge1
.gefra1
.gla3t
.gla1
.gran2a3t
.gra1
.grana1
.hep2a3t
.he1
.hepa1
kandid2a3t
ka4n1d
kandi1
kandida1
.kar2a3t
.kara1
.kazem2a3t
.kaze1
.kazema1
.klim2a3t
.kli1
.klima1
.kom2a3t
.ko1
.koma1
.komit2a3t
.komi1
.komita1
.komp2a3t
.ko4m1p
.kompa1
konkord2a3t
ko4n1k
konko1
konko4r1d
konkorda1
.konst2a3t
.ko4n1s
.kon1s2t
.konsta1
.krav2a3t
.kra1
.krava1
kro3m2a3t
kro1
kroma1
.kvadr2a3t
.kvadra1
magistr2a3t
magi1
magis1t
magistra1
.magn2a3t
.mag1n
.magna1
majorit2a3t
majo1
majori1
majorita1
malgl2a3t
ma4l1g
malgla1
.ma2l1
.mals2a3t
.ma4l1s2
.malsa1
.mand2a3t
.ma4n1d
.manda1
.mecen2a3t
.me1
.mece1
.mecena1
minorit2a3t
mi1
mino1
minori1
minorita1
.mon2a3t
.mona1
.mu3l
.mul2a3t
.mu1
.mula1
.musk2a3t
.mus1k
.muska1
ordin2a3t
.pal2a3t
.pala1
.pir2a3t
.pi1
.pira1
.prel2a3t
.pre1
.prela1
.prim2a3t
.pri1
.prima1
priorit2a3t
pri3o1
priori1
priorita1
.priv2a3t
.priva1
.rab2a3t
.raba1
.ren2a3t
.re1
.rena1
.ril2a3t
.ri1
.rila1
.sab2a3t
.saba1
.sal2a3t
.sala1
.se2n1
.sen2a3t
.se1
.sena1
sindik2a3t
si4n1d
sindi1
sindika1
.skarl2a3t
.ska1
.ska4r1l
.skarla1
.sold2a3t
.so1
.so4l1d
.solda1
.son2a3t
.sona1
.sp2a3t
.spa1
stigm2a3t
sti1
stig1m
stigma1
substr2a3t
su4b1s
subs1t
substra1
surog2a3t
suro1
suroga1
.tok2a3t
.to1
.toka1
.tom2a3t
.toma1
.ultim2a3t
.u1
.u4l1t
.ulti1
.ultima1
universit2a3t
uni1
unive1
unive4r1s
universi1
universita1
.vulg2a3t
.vu1
.vu4l1g
.vulga1
.ĉe2f1
.ĉe1
.ĉi4a1
.ĉi1
.ĉia4m1
.ĉi4e1
.ĉie4s
.ĉi4o1
.ĉio4m
.ĉi4u1
ĉi3el1
ĉi3e1
4ĉ1j2
3ĉ2jo1
.di2s1
.di3s2e4r1t
.dise1
.di3s2e4r1v
.di3s2ip
.disi1
.di3s2oci1
.diso1
.di3s2a.
.disa1
.di3s2aj.
.di3s2a2jn.
.disa4j1n
.di3s2an.
.di3s2e.
.di3s2en.
.du2m1
dump2i4n3g
du1
du4m1p
dumpi1
.du2on1
.du3o1
1e2bla.
ebla1
1e2bl2aj.
1e2bl2a2jn.
ebla4j1n
1e2bl2an.
1e2ble.
e1ble1
1e2blo.
eblo1
1e2bl2oj.
1e2bl2o2jn.
eblo4j1n
1e2bl2on.
1e2bl2as.
1e2bli.
ebli1
1e2blis.
1e2bl2os.
1e2blu.
eblu1
1e2bl2us.
1e2bl1ec
1e2bl1aĵ
.fe3b1l
.fe1
.me3b1l
1e2ca.
eca1
1e2c2aj.
1e2c2a2jn.
eca4j1n
1e2c2an.
1e2ce.
ece1
1e2co.
eco1
1e2c2oj.
1e2c2o2jn.
eco4j1n
1e2c2on.
.apr2e3c
.apre1
.de3c
.pe3c
s1p
sp2e3c
spe1
1e2ga.
ega1
1e2g2aj.
1e2g2a2jn.
ega4j1n
1e2g2an.
1e2ge.
ege1
1e2go.
ego1
1e2g2oj.
1e2g2o2jn.
ego4j1n
1e2g2on.
1e2g2as.
1e2gi.
egi1
1e2gis.
1e2g2os.
1e2gu.
egu1
1e2g2us.
.del2e3g
.dele1
.fl2e3g
.fle1
kol2e3g
kole1
.om2e3g
.ome1
.prel2e3g
.prele1
.strat2e3g
.stra1
.strate1
.norv2e3g
.no1
.no4r1v
.norve1
1e2ja.
eja1
1e2j2aj.
1e2j2a2jn.
eja4j1n
1e2j2an.
1e2je.
eje1
1e2jo.
ejo1
1e2j2oj.
1e2j2o2jn.
ejo4j1n
1e2j2on.
1e2j1ig
eji1
1e2j1iĝ
.be3j
.be1
.pl2ej
.ple1
malpl2ej
ma4l1p
malple1
.e4k2s1
.ek3s2ci1
.eks1c
ek4s3cit
e4k1s
eks1c
eksci1
ek4s3ciz
.ek3s2id
.eksi1
.ek1i2r
.eki1
.ek1rid
.ekri1
1e2kzem
e4k1z
ekze1
.ekste2r1
.eks1t
.e1kste1
.ekste3ra.
.ekstera1
.ekste3r2aj.
.ekste3r2a2jn.
.ekstera4j1n
.ekste3r2an.
.ekste3re.
.ekstere1
.ekste3ro.
.ekstero1
.ekste3r2oj.
.ekste3r2o2jn.
.ekstero4j1n
.ekste3r2on.
.ekste3r2as.
.ekste3ri.
.eksteri1
.ekste3ris.
.ekste3r2os.
.ekste3ru.
.eksteru1
.ekste3r2us.
.el1i2r
.eli1
.el1a2ĉ2e3t
.ela1
.elaĉe1
.el1uz
.elu1
1e2ma.
ema1
1e2m2aj.
1e2m2a2jn.
ema4j1n
1e2m2an.
1e2me.
e1me1
1e2mo.
emo1
1e2m2oj.
1e2m2o2jn.
emo4j1n
1e2m2on.
1e2m2as.
1e2mi.
emi1
1e2mis.
1e2m2os.
1e2mu.
emu1
1e2m2us.
1e2m1ec
.alpr2e3m
.a4l1p
.alpre1
.anat2e3m
.ana1
.anate1
blasf2e3m
bla1
blas1f
blasfe1
.boh2e3m
.bo1
.bohe1
diad2e3m
di3a1
diade1
.dil2e3m
.dile1
.ed2e3m
.ede1
ekstr2e3m
ek1s2t2r
eks1t
ekstre1
.ektr2e3m
.e4k1t
.ektre1
.ekpr2e3m
.e4k1p
.ekpre1
embl2e3m
e4m1b
emble1
emfiz2e3m
e4m1f
emfi1
emfize1
.e2kz2e3m
.e4k1z
.ekze1
.har2e3m
.hare1
jerusal2e3m
je1
jeru1
jerusa1
jerusale1
krizant2e3m
kri1
kriza1
kriza4n1t
krizante1
.le3m
.le1
.po2e3m
.po3e1
.pr2e3m
.probl2e3m
.pro1
.proble1
.sk2e3m
.ske1
.te3m
.te1
.tand2e3m
.ta4n1d
.tande1
.teor2e3m
.te3o1
.teore1
.tot2e3m
.tote1
.tr2e3m
.tre1
sist2e3m
sis1t
siste1
.en1ir2
.eni1
1en2da.
e4n1d
enda1
1en2d2aj.
1en2d2a2jn.
enda4j1n
1en2d2an.
1en2de.
ende1
1en2d2as.
1en2di.
endi1
1en2dis.
1en2d2os.
endo1
1en2du.
endu1
1en2d2us.
1en2do.
1en2d2on.
.am2e4n3d
.ame1
.at2e4n3d
.ate1
.def2e4n3d
.defe1
.et2e4n3d
.ete1
.kal2e4n3d
.kale1
kresĉ2e4n3d
kre1
kre4s1ĉ
kresĉe1
.me4n3d
.of2e4n3d
.ofe1
.pe4n3d
.pl2e4n3d
pret2e4n3d
pre1te1
rekom2e4n3d
reko1
rekome1
.se4n3d
s1c
sc2e4n3d
sce1
.te4n3d
.ve4n3d
1e2ta.
eta1
1e2t2aj.
1e2t2a2jn.
eta4j1n
1e2t2an.
1e2te.
ete1
1e2to.
eto1
1e2t2oj.
1e2t2o2jn.
eto4j1n
1e2t2on.
1e2ta2as.
eta3a1
1e2tai.
eta3i1
1e2tais.
1e2ta2os.
eta3o1
1e2tau.
eta3u1
1e2ta2us.
a2ĉ2e3t
alfab2e3t
a4l1f
alfa1
alfabe1
alum2e3t
alu1
alume1
amul2e3t
amu1
amule1
.ask2e3t
.as1k
.aske1
.atl2e3t
.atle1
.be3t
bajon2e3t
bajo1
bajone1
bil2e3t
bile1
.bol2e3t
.bole1
bracel2e3t
bra1
brace1
bracele1
brev2e3t
bre1
breve1
.buĝ2e3t
.bu1
.buĝe1
.deb2e3t
.debe1
.dem2e3t
.deme1
diab2e3t
diabe1
elizab2e3t
eli1
eliza1
elizabe1
.enk2e3t
.e4n1k
.enke1
epit2e3t
epi1
epite1
.fo2r1
.form2e3t
.fo1
.fo4r1m
.forme1
.gaz2e3t
.gaze1
.herm2e3t
.he4r1m
.herme1
.ĥe3t
.ĥe1
.ĵak2e3t
.ĵa1
.ĵake1
ĵ2e3t
ĵe1
kabin2e3t
kabi1
kabine1
.kad2e3t
.kade1
kastanj2e3t
kas1t
kasta1
kasta4n1j
kastanje1
.kin2e3t
.ki1
.kine1
klarn2e3t
kla4r1n
klarne1
kloz2e3t
klo1
kloze1
.kom2e3t
.kome1
kompl2e3t
komple1
.konf2e3t
.ko4n1f
.konfe1
kors2e3t
ko4r1s
korse1
korv2e3t
ko4r1v
korve1
kotl2e3t
kotle1
.krik2e3t
.kri1
.krike1
.krok2e3t
.kro1
.kroke1
kvodlib2e3t
kvo1
kvo4d1l
kvodli1
kvodlibe1
.me3t
magn2e3t
mag1n
magne1
marion2e3t
mari1
mari3o1
marione1
.mo3t
.mot2e3t
.mote1
.ne3t
.ne1
.oml2e3t
.o4m1l
.omle1
pamfl2e3t
pa4m1f
pamfle1
parg2e3t
pa4r1g
parge1
.pl2e3t
.po2e3t
.prof2e3t
.profe1
.prol2e3t
.prole1
.rak2e3t
.rake1
.rem2e3t
.reme1
.rip2e3t
.ripe1
sekr2e3t
sekre1
skel2e3t
ske1
skele1
.son2e3t
.sone1
.sov2e3t
.sove1
spag2e3t
spa1
spage1
spin2e3t
spi1
spine1
staf2e3t
sta1
stafe1
.st2i3l
.stil2e3t
.sti1
.stile1
ŝibol2e3t
ŝi1
ŝibo1
ŝibole1
.tib2e3t
.ti1
.tibe1
tual2e3t
tu3a1
tuale1
.ve3t
.veg2e3t
.vege1
.vend2e3t
.vende1
vinj2e3t
vi1
vi4n1j
vinje1
1es2tr
es1t
.fo3r2i4n3t
.fori1
.fo3r2u3m
.foru1
.fo3r2a.
.fora1
.fo3r2aj.
.fo3r2a2jn.
.fora4j1n
.fo3r2an.
.fo3r2e.
.fore1
.fo3r2o.
.fo1ro1
.fo3r2oj.
.fo3r2o2jn.
.foro4j1n
.fo3r2on.
.fo3r2en
.fo3r2as.
.fo3r2i.
.fo3r2is.
.fo3r2os.
.fo3r2u.
.fo3r2us.
.ĝi2s1
.ĝi1
1i2da.
ida1
1i2d2aj.
1i2d2a2jn.
ida4j1n
1i2d2an.
1i2de.
ide1
1i2do.
ido1
1i2d2oj.
1i2d2o2jn.
ido4j1n
1i2d2on.
.abs2i3d
.a4b1s
.absi1
.ac2i3d
.aci1
.akr2i3d
.a2kr
.akri1
.aps2i3d
.ap1s
.apsi1
